Virginia statutes. Title 13.1. Corporations.
Article 9. Foreign Business Trusts.

§ 13.1-1241.
Authority to transact business required; governing law.

A foreign business trust may not transact business in the Commonwealth until it obtains a certificate of registration from the Commission.

Subject to the Constitution of the Commonwealth:

The laws of the state or other jurisdiction under which a foreign business trust is formed govern its formation and internal affairs and the liability of its beneficial owners and trustees; and

A foreign business trust may not be denied a certificate of registration by reason of any difference between those laws and the laws of the Commonwealth.However, a foreign business trust holding a valid certificate of registration to transact business in the Commonwealth shall have no greater rights and privileges than a domestic business trust. The certificate of registration shall not be deemed to authorize the foreign business trust to exercise any of its powers or purposes that a domestic business trust is forbidden by law to exercise in the Commonwealth.

History.

2002, c. 621; 2008, c. 101.

Cross references.

As to registered office and registered agent, see §§

13.1-1220

and

13.1-1221

.

Effective date.

This chapter became effective October 1, 2003.

The 2008 amendments.

The 2008 amendment by c. 101, effective April 1, 2009, inserted subsection A and designated the existing provisions of the section as subsection B; inserted “a certificate of” in subdivision B 2; inserted “certificate of” twice and “to transact business” in the last paragraph; and made stylistic changes throughout subsection B.

Law Review.

For annual survey article, “Corporate and Business Law,” see 44 U. Rich. L. Rev. 307 (2009).

§ 13.1-1242.
Application for certificate of registration.

A foreign business trust may apply to the Commission for a certificate of registration to transact business in the Commonwealth. The application shall be made on a form prescribed and furnished by the Commission. The application shall set forth:

The name of the foreign business trust and, if the business trust is prevented by §

13.1-1244

from using its own name in the Commonwealth, a designated name that satisfies the requirements of §

13.1-1244

;

The foreign business trust’s jurisdiction of formation, and if the foreign business trust was previously authorized or registered to transact business in the Commonwealth as a foreign corporation, nonstock corporation, limited liability company, business trust, limited partnership, or registered limited liability partnership, with respect to every such prior authorization or registration, (i) the name of the entity; (ii) the entity type; (iii) the state or other jurisdiction of incorporation, organization, or formation; and (iv) the entity identification number issued to it by the Commission;

The foreign business trust’s original date of formation, organization, or incorporation as an entity and its period of duration.

The address of the proposed registered office of the foreign business trust in the Commonwealth (including both (i) the post office address with street and number, if any, and (ii) the name of the county or city in which it is located) and the name of its proposed registered agent in the Commonwealth at such address and that the registered agent is either (a) an individual who is a resident of the Commonwealth and is either (1) a trustee or officer of the business trust, (2) an officer or director of a corporation that is a trustee of the business trust, (3) a partner of a partnership that is a trustee of a business trust, (4) a general partner of a limited partnership that is a trustee of the business trust, (5) a member or manager of a limited liability company that is a trustee of the business trust, (6) a trustee of a business trust or other trust that is a trustee of the business trust, or (7) a member of the Virginia State Bar, or (b) a domestic or foreign stock or nonstock corporation, limited liability company, or registered limited liability partnership authorized to transact business in the Commonwealth, the business office of which is identical with the registered office;

A statement that the clerk of the Commission is irrevocably appointed the agent of the foreign business trust for service of process if the foreign business trust fails to maintain a registered agent in the Commonwealth as required by §

13.1-1220

, the registered agent’s authority has been revoked, the registered agent has resigned, or the registered agent cannot be found or served with the exercise of reasonable diligence;

The post office address, including the street and number, if any, of the foreign business trust’s principal office; and

A statement evidencing that the foreign business trust is a “foreign business trust” as defined in §

13.1-1201

.

The foreign business trust shall deliver with the completed application a copy of the articles of trust or other constituent documents and all amendments and corrections thereto, duly authenticated by the Secretary of State or other official having custody of business trust records in its jurisdiction of formation.

A foreign business is not precluded from receiving a certificate of registration to transact business in the Commonwealth because of any difference between the law of the foreign business trust’s jurisdiction of formation and the law of the Commonwealth.

If the Commission finds that the application complies with the requirements of law and that all required fees have been paid, it shall issue a certificate of registration to transact business in the Commonwealth.

History.

2002, c. 621; 2004, c. 274; 2008, c. 101; 2021, Sp. Sess. I, c. 487.

Editor’s note.

Acts 2021, Sp. Sess. I, c. 487, cl. 4 provides: “That the provisions of this act (i) shall be applied prospectively only; (ii) shall not affect the validity of any filing made, or other action taken, prior to July 1, 2021, with respect to the name of a stock corporation, nonstock corporation, limited liability company, business trust, or limited partnership; and (iii) shall not be construed to require any such stock corporation, nonstock corporation, limited liability company, business trust, or limited partnership that was in compliance with applicable laws regarding the distinguishability of its name prior to July 1, 2021, to change its name or take other action to comply with the requirements of this act.”

The 2004 amendments.

The 2004 amendment by c. 274 rewrote subdivisions 2, 3 and 5 and made minor stylistic changes.

The 2008 amendments.

The 2008 amendment by c. 101, effective April 1, 2009, designated the existing provisions of the section as subsection A and rewrote the introductory paragraph and subdivision A 4; deleted former subdivision A 6 requiring a copy of the articles of trust; redesignated former subdivision A 7 as A 6; made a related change at the end of subdivision A 5; and added subsections B and C.

The 2021 Sp. Sess. I amendments.

The 2021 amendment by Sp. Sess. I, c. 487, effective July 1, 2021, in subdivision A 2, substituted “The foreign business trust’s jurisdiction of formation, and if the foreign business trust” for “The name of the state or other jurisdiction under whose law it is formed, the date of its formation, and if the business trust” and inserted “nonstock corporation”; inserted a new subdivision A 3; substituted “(3) a partner of a partnership that is a trustee of a business trust, (4) a general partner of a” for “(3) a general partner of a general or” in subdivision A 4 and renumbered remaining numbered clauses accordingly; rewrote subsection B; and inserted subsection C; and made stylistic changes. For applicability clause, see Editor’s note.

§ 13.1-1243.
Repealed by Acts 2008, c. 101, cl. 2, effective April 1, 2009.

Editor’s note.

Former §

13.1-1243

, relating to issuance of registration, was enacted by Acts 2002, c. 621.

§ 13.1-1244.
Name.

No certificate of registration shall be issued to a foreign business trust unless the name of such foreign business trust satisfies the requirements of §

13.1-1214

.

If the name of a foreign business trust does not satisfy the requirements of §

13.1-1214

, to obtain or maintain a certificate of registration to transact business in the Commonwealth, the foreign business trust may use a designated name that is available, and which satisfies the requirements of §

13.1-1214

, if it informs the Commission of the designated name.

History.

2002, c. 621; 2012, c. 63.

Cross references.

As to issuance of certificate by commission and recordation of documents, see §

13.1-1203

.

Editor’s note.

Acts 2012, c. 63, cl. 2 provides: “That the provisions of this act (i) shall be applied prospectively only; (ii) shall not affect the validity of any filing made, or other action taken, prior to the effective date of this act with respect to the name of a corporation, limited liability company, business trust, or limited partnership; and (iii) shall not be construed to require any such corporation, limited liability company, business trust, or limited partnership that was in compliance with applicable laws regarding the propriety of its name prior to the effective date of this act to change its name or take other action to comply with the requirements of this act.”

The 2012 amendments.

The 2012 amendment by c. 63 substituted “the name of a foreign business trust does not satisfy the requirements of §

13.1-1214

, to obtain or maintain a certificate of registration to transact business in the Commonwealth” for “its real name is unavailable” in subsection B.

§ 13.1-1245.
Amendments; amended applications for registration.

Whenever the articles of trust or other constituent document of a foreign business trust that is registered to transact business in the Commonwealth is amended or corrected, the foreign business trust shall promptly file with the Commission a copy of the amendment or correction duly authenticated by the Secretary of State or other official having custody of the business trust records in the state or other jurisdiction of its formation.

If any statement in the application for registration of a foreign business trust was false when made or any arrangements or other facts described have changed, making the application inaccurate in any respect, the foreign business trust shall promptly file with the Commission an amended application for registration amending such statement or information. The amended application for registration shall be made on a form prescribed and furnished by the Commission.

History.

2002, c. 621; 2008, c. 101.

Cross references.

As to fees charged by the Commission, see §

13.1-1204

.

The 2008 amendments.

The 2008 amendment by c. 101, effective April 1, 2009, inserted subsection A, and redesignated and rewrote the existing provisions of the section as subsection B.

§ 13.1-1246.
Voluntary cancellation of certificate of registration.

A foreign business trust registered to transact business in the Commonwealth may apply to the Commission for a certificate of cancellation to cancel its certificate of registration. The application shall be on a form prescribed and furnished by the Commission, which shall set forth:

The name of the foreign business trust and the name of the state or other jurisdiction under whose law it is or was formed, and the identification number issued by the Commission to the business trust;

If applicable, that the foreign business trust was a party to a merger permitted by the laws of the state or other jurisdiction under whose laws it was organized and that it was not the surviving entity of the merger;

That the foreign business trust is not transacting business in the Commonwealth and that it surrenders its registration to transact business in the Commonwealth;

That the foreign business trust revokes the authority of its registered agent to accept service on its behalf and appoints the clerk of the Commission as its agent for service of process in any proceeding based on a cause of action arising during the time it was authorized to transact business in the Commonwealth;

A mailing address to which the clerk of the Commission may mail a copy of any process served on him under subdivision 4; and

A commitment to notify the clerk of the Commission in the future of any change in the mailing address of the business trust.

If the Commission finds that the application complies with the requirements of law and all required fees have been paid, it shall issue a certificate of cancellation canceling the certificate of registration.

Before any foreign business trust registered to transact business in the Commonwealth cancels its existence, it shall file with the Commission an application for a certificate of cancellation. Whether or not such application is filed, the cancellation of the existence of such foreign business trust shall not take away or impair any remedy available against such business trust for any right or claim existing or any liability incurred prior to such cancellation. Any such action or proceeding against such foreign business trust may be defended by such business trust in its name. The trustees and beneficial owners shall have power to take such action as shall be appropriate to protect such remedy, right, or claim. The right of a foreign business trust that has canceled its existence to institute and maintain in its name actions, suits, or proceedings in the courts of the Commonwealth shall be governed by the law of the state of its formation.

Service of process on the clerk of the Commission is service of process on a foreign business trust whose certificate of registration has been canceled pursuant to this section. Service upon the clerk shall be made in accordance with §

12.1-19.1

, and service upon the foreign business trust may be made in any other manner permitted by law.

History.

2002, c. 621; 2008, cc. 588, 770; 2009, c. 167; 2012, c. 130; 2013, c. 25.

The 2008 amendments.

The 2008 amendments by cc. 588 and 770 are identical, and added subsections C through E.

The 2009 amendments.

The 2009 amendment by c. 167, effective April 1, 2009, deleted C through E relating to involuntary cancellation of certificate by order of Commission upon the company’s conviction under 8 U.S.C. § 1324a(f).

The 2012 amendments.

The 2012 amendment by c. 130 rewrote the introductory paragraph of subsection A, which formerly read: “A foreign business trust may cancel its certificate of registration by delivering to the Commission articles of cancellation on forms prescribed and furnished by the Commission that shall set forth”; added subdivision A 2; redesignated former subdivisions A 2 through A 5 as subdivisions A 3 through A 6; substituted “the Commonwealth” for “this Commonwealth” twice in subdivision A 3 and in A 4; in subdivision A 5, inserted “of the Commission” and substituted “subdivision 4” for “subdivision 3 of this subsection”; rewrote subsection B, which formerly read: “If the Commission finds that the articles of cancellation conform to the provisions of this article and all required fees have been paid, it shall file the articles and the certificate of registration shall be canceled”; and added subsections C and D.

The 2013 amendments.

The 2013 amendment by c. 25 substituted “whose law it is or was formed, and the identification number issued by the Commission to the business trust” for “whose jurisdiction it was formed” in subdivision A 1; and rewrote subdivision A 2, which formerly read: “That the foreign business trust is in existence and has not been merged into or consolidated with another entity or converted into another type of entity or, if the foreign business trust has been merged into or consolidated with another entity or converted into another type of entity, that the application is signed on behalf of the foreign business trust by the surviving or resulting entity.”

§ 13.1-1246.1.
Automatic cancellation of registration.

Whether or not the notice described in subsection B of §

13.1-1254

is mailed, if any foreign business trust fails to pay its annual registration fee on or before December 31 of the year assessed, such foreign business trust shall automatically cease to be authorized to transact business in the Commonwealth and its certificate of registration shall be automatically canceled as of that day.

If any foreign business trust whose registered agent has filed with the Commission a statement of resignation pursuant to §

13.1-1222

fails to file a statement of change pursuant to §

13.1-1221

within 31 days after the date on which the statement of resignation was filed, the Commission shall mail notice to the foreign business trust of the impending cancellation of its certificate of registration. If the business trust fails to file the statement of change before the last day of the second month immediately following the month in which the impending cancellation notice was mailed, the business trust shall automatically cease to be authorized to transact business in the Commonwealth and its certificate of registration shall be automatically canceled as of that day.

The automatic cancellation of a foreign business trust’s certificate of registration constitutes the appointment of the clerk of the Commission as the foreign business trust’s agent for service of process in any proceeding based on a cause of action arising during the time the foreign business trust was registered to transact business in the Commonwealth. Service of process on the clerk of the Commission under this subsection is service on the foreign business trust and shall be made on the clerk in accordance with §

12.1-19.1

.

Cancellation of a foreign business trust’s certificate of registration does not terminate the authority of the registered agent of the foreign business trust.

History.

2008, c. 101; 2013, c. 25.

Editor’s note.

Acts 2008, c. 101, cl. 3 provides: “That the provisions of this act shall become effective on April 1, 2009.”

The 2013 amendments.

The 2013 amendment by c. 25, in subsection A, inserted “Whether or not the notice described in subsection B of §

13.1-1254

is mailed” and “such foreign business trust shall automatically cease to be authorized to transact business in the Commonwealth and” and deleted “to transact business in the Commonwealth” following “certificate of registration”; and added subsections C and D.

§ 13.1-1246.2.
Involuntary cancellation of registration.

The certificate of registration to transact business in the Commonwealth of any foreign business trust may be canceled involuntarily by order of the Commission when it finds that the foreign business trust:

Has continued to exceed or abuse the authority conferred upon it by law;

Has failed to maintain a registered office or a registered agent in the Commonwealth as required by law;

Has failed to file any document required by this chapter to be filed with the Commission;

No longer exists under the laws of the state or other jurisdiction of its formation; or

Has been convicted for a violation of 8 U.S.C. § 1324a(f), as amended, for actions of its trustees or beneficial owners authorized to act on the behalf of a foreign business trust constituting a pattern or practice of employing unauthorized aliens in the Commonwealth.

Before entering any such order, the Commission shall issue a rule against the foreign business trust giving it an opportunity to be heard and show cause why such an order should not be entered. The Commission may issue the rule on its own motion or on motion of the Attorney General.

The authority of a foreign business trust to transact business in the Commonwealth ceases on the date shown on the order canceling its certificate of registration.

The Commission’s cancellation of a foreign business trust’s certificate of registration appoints the clerk of the Commission the foreign business trust’s agent for service of process in any proceeding based on a cause of action arising during the time the foreign business trust was authorized to transact business in the Commonwealth. Service of process on the clerk of the Commission under this subsection is service on the foreign business trust and shall be made on the clerk in accordance with §

12.1-19.1

.

Cancellation of a foreign business trust’s certificate of registration does not terminate the authority of the registered agent of the foreign business trust.

Any foreign business trust convicted of the offense listed in subdivision A 5 shall immediately report such conviction to the Commission and file with the Commission an authenticated copy of the judgment or record of conviction. A certificate of registration canceled pursuant to subdivision A 5 shall not be eligible for reinstatement for a period of not less than one year.

History.

2008, c. 101; 2009, c. 167.

Editor’s note.

Acts 2008, c. 101, cl. 3 provides: “That the provisions of this act shall become effective on April 1, 2009.”

The 2009 amendments.

The 2009 amendment by c. 167, effective April 1, 2009, added subdivision A 5 and made related changes; and added subsection F.

§ 13.1-1246.3.
Reinstatement of a certificate of registration that has been canceled.

A foreign business trust whose certificate of registration to transact business in the Commonwealth has been canceled may be relieved of the cancellation and have its certificate of registration reinstated by the Commission within five years of the date of cancellation unless the certificate of registration was canceled by order of the Commission entered pursuant to subdivision A 1 of §

13.1-1246.2

.

To have its certificate of registration reinstated, a foreign business trust shall provide the Commission with the following:

An application for reinstatement, which may be in the form of a letter, that includes the identification number issued by the Commission to the business trust;

A reinstatement fee of $100;

All annual registration fees and penalties that were due before the certificate of registration was canceled and that would have been assessed or imposed to the date of reinstatement if the business trust had not had its certificate of registration canceled;

A duly authenticated copy of any amendments or corrections made to the articles of trust or other constituent documents of the foreign business trust and any mergers entered into by the foreign business trust from the date of cancellation of its certificate of registration to the date of its application for reinstatement, with an amended application for registration if required for an amendment or a correction, and all fees required by this chapter for the filing of such instruments;

If the name of the foreign business trust does not comply with the provisions of §

13.1-1214

at the time of reinstatement, an amended application for registration to adopt a designated name for use in the Commonwealth that satisfies the requirements of §

13.1-1214

, along with the fee required by this chapter for the filing of an amended application for registration; and

If the foreign business trust’s registered agent has filed a statement of resignation and a new registered agent has not been appointed, a statement of change pursuant to §

13.1-1221

.

If the foreign business trust complies with the provisions of this section, the Commission shall enter an order of reinstatement, reinstating the foreign business trust’s certificate of registration to transact business in the Commonwealth.

History.

2008, c. 101; 2013, c. 25.

Editor’s note.

Acts 2008, c. 101, cl. 3 provides: “That the provisions of this act shall become effective on April 1, 2009.”

The 2013 amendments.

The 2013 amendment by c. 25, in subdivision B 1, deleted “signed by a trustee or an officer of the business trust” following “reinstatement” and added “that includes the identification number issued by the Commission to the business trust.”

§ 13.1-1247.
Transaction of business without registration; civil penalty.

A foreign business trust transacting business in the Commonwealth shall not maintain any action, suit, or proceeding in any court of the Commonwealth until it has registered in the Commonwealth.

The successor to a foreign business trust that transacted business in the Commonwealth without registering in the Commonwealth and the assignee of a cause of action arising out of that business may not maintain a proceeding based on that cause of action in any court in the Commonwealth until the foreign business trust or its successor has registered in the Commonwealth.

The failure of a foreign business trust to register in the Commonwealth shall not impair the validity of any contract or act of the foreign business trust or prevent the foreign business trust from defending any action, suit, or proceeding in any court of the Commonwealth.

If a foreign business trust transacts business in the Commonwealth without a certificate of registration, each trustee, officer or employee of the business trust who does any such business in the Commonwealth knowing that a certificate of authority is required and has not been obtained shall be liable for a civil penalty of not less than $500 and not more than $5,000, which may be imposed by the Commission or by any court in the Commonwealth before which an action against the business trust may lie, after the business trust and the individual have been given notice and an opportunity to be heard. Civil penalties paid pursuant to this chapter shall be deposited to the credit of the Literary Fund.

Suits, actions, and proceedings may be initiated against a foreign business trust that transacts business in the Commonwealth without a certificate of registration by serving process on any trustee, officer, or agent of the business trust doing such business, or, if none can be found, on the clerk of the Commission or on the business trust in any other manner permitted by law. If any foreign business trust transacts business in the Commonwealth without a certificate of registration, it shall by transacting such business be deemed to have thereby appointed the clerk of the Commission its agent for service of process. Service upon the clerk shall be made in accordance with §

12.1-19.1

.

History.

2002, c. 621; 2008, c. 523; 2013, c. 25.

The 2008 amendments.

The 2008 amendment by c. 523 inserted subsection B and substituted “the Commonwealth” for “this Commonwealth” throughout this section; and redesignated former subsections B through D as subsections C through E.

The 2013 amendments.

The 2013 amendment by c. 25 rewrote subsection E, which formerly read: “A foreign business trust, by transacting business in the Commonwealth without registration, appoints the clerk of the Commission as its agent for service of process with respect to causes of action arising out of the transaction of business in the Commonwealth.”

§ 13.1-1248.
Actions by Attorney General.

The Attorney General may bring an action to restrain a foreign business trust from transacting business in this Commonwealth in violation of this article.

History.

2002, c. 621.

§ 13.1-1249.
Transactions not constituting doing business.

The following activities of a foreign business trust, among others, do not constitute transacting business within the meaning of this article:

Maintaining, defending, or settling any proceeding;

Holding meetings of its beneficial owners or carrying on any other activities concerning its internal affairs;

Maintaining bank accounts;

Maintaining offices or agencies for the transfer, exchange and registration of the foreign business trust’s securities or maintaining trustees or depositaries with respect to those securities;

Selling through independent contractors;

Soliciting or obtaining orders, whether by mail or through employees or agents or otherwise, if the orders require acceptance outside this Commonwealth before they become contracts;

Creating or acquiring indebtedness, deeds of trust, and security interests in real or personal property;

Securing or collecting debts or enforcing deeds of trust and security interests in property securing the debts;

Owning, without more, real or personal property;

Conducting an isolated transaction that is completed within 30 days and that is not one in the course of repeated transactions of a like nature;

For a period of less than 90 consecutive days, producing, directing, filming, crewing or acting in motion picture feature films, television series or commercials, or promotional films that are sent outside of the Commonwealth for processing, editing, marketing and distribution; or

Serving, without more, as a general partner of, or as a partner in a partnership that is a general partner of, a domestic or foreign limited partnership that does not otherwise transact business in the Commonwealth.

The term “transacting business” as used in this section shall have no effect on personal jurisdiction under §

8.01-328.1

.

The list of activities in subsection A is not exhaustive. This section does not apply in determining the contacts or activities that may subject a foreign business trust to service of process or taxation in this Commonwealth or to regulation under any other law of this Commonwealth.

History.

2002, c. 621; 2013, c. 25.

The 2013 amendments.

The 2013 amendment by c. 25 added subdivision A 12, and made related and minor stylistic changes.

§ 13.1-1250.
Merger of foreign business trust registered to transact business in Commonwealth.

Whenever a foreign business trust registered to transact business in this Commonwealth is a party to a merger permitted by the laws of the state or other jurisdiction under whose laws it is organized, and that business trust is the surviving entity of the merger, it shall, within 30 days after the merger becomes effective, file with the Commission a copy of the instrument of merger duly authenticated by the secretary of state or other official having custody of business trust records in the state or other jurisdiction under whose laws the merger was effected. However, the filing shall not be required when a foreign business trust merges with a domestic corporation, limited liability company, limited partnership, business trust, or partnership; the foreign business trust’s articles of trust or other constituent documents are not amended by the merger; and the articles or statement of merger filed on behalf of the domestic corporation, limited liability company, limited partnership, business trust, or partnership pursuant to §

13.1-720

,

13.1-1072

,

13.1-1261

,

50-73.48:3

, or

50-73.131

contains a statement that the merger is permitted under the laws of the state or other jurisdiction in which the foreign business trust is formed and that the foreign business trust has complied with that law in effecting the merger.

Whenever a foreign business trust registered to transact business in this Commonwealth is a party to a merger permitted by the laws of the state or other jurisdiction under the laws of which it is organized, and that business trust is not the surviving entity of the merger, the surviving entity shall, if not continuing to transact business in this Commonwealth, within 30 days after such merger becomes effective, deliver to the Commission a copy of the instrument of merger duly authenticated by the secretary of state or other official having custody of business trust records in the state or other jurisdiction under whose laws the merger was effected, and comply on behalf of the predecessor business trust with the provisions of §

13.1-1246

. If the surviving entity is to continue to transact business in this Commonwealth and has not received a certificate of authority to transact business in this Commonwealth or registered as a foreign business entity it shall, within 30 days after the merger becomes effective, deliver to the Commission an application (i) if a foreign business trust, for registration as a foreign business trust, (ii) if a foreign limited liability company, for registration as a foreign limited liability company, (iii) if a foreign limited partnership, for registration as a foreign limited partnership or (iv) if a foreign corporation, for a certificate of authority to transact business in this Commonwealth, together with a duly authenticated copy of the instrument of merger and also a copy of its articles of trust, articles of organization, certificate of limited partnership or articles of incorporation and all amendments thereto, duly authenticated by the secretary of state or other official having custody of the business trust, limited liability company, limited partnership or corporate records in the state or other jurisdiction under whose laws it is organized, formed or incorporated.

Upon the merger of a foreign business trust with one or more foreign business trusts, limited liability companies, limited partnerships or corporations, all property in this Commonwealth owned by any of the business trusts, limited liability companies, limited partnerships or corporations shall pass to the surviving business trust, limited liability company, limited partnership or corporation except as otherwise provided by the laws of the jurisdiction by which it is governed, but only from and after the time when a duly authenticated copy of the instrument of merger is filed with the Commission.

History.

2002, c. 621; 2008, c. 101.

Cross references.

As to fees charged by the Commission, see §

13.1-1204

.

The 2008 amendments.

The 2008 amendment by c. 101, effective April 1, 2009, added the second sentence of subsection A, and made stylistic changes in subsection B.

§ 13.1-1250.1.
Entity conversion of foreign business trust registered to transact business in Commonwealth.

Whenever a foreign business trust that is registered to transact business in the Commonwealth converts to another type of entity, the surviving or resulting entity shall, within 30 days after such entity conversion becomes effective, file with the Commission a copy of the instrument of entity conversion duly authenticated by the Secretary of State or other official having custody of business trust records in the state or other jurisdiction under whose laws such entity conversion was effected; and

If the surviving or resulting entity is not continuing to transact business in the Commonwealth or is not a foreign corporation, limited liability company, limited partnership, or registered limited liability partnership, then, within 30 days after such entity conversion, it shall comply on behalf of the predecessor business trust with the provisions of §

13.1-1246

; or

If the surviving or resulting entity is a foreign corporation, limited liability company, limited partnership, or registered limited liability partnership and is to continue to transact business in the Commonwealth, then, within such 30 days, it shall deliver to the Commission an application for a certificate of authority or registration to transact business in the Commonwealth or, in the case of a foreign registered limited liability partnership, a statement of registration.

Upon the entity conversion of a foreign business trust that is registered to transact business in the Commonwealth, all property in the Commonwealth owned by the foreign business trust shall pass to the surviving or resulting entity except as otherwise provided by the laws of the state or other jurisdiction by which it is governed, but only from and after the time when a duly authenticated copy of the instrument of entity conversion is filed with the Commission.

History.

2004, c. 274.

Editor’s note.

Acts 2021, Sp. Sess. I, c. 487, cl. 3 provides: “That until July 1, 2023, the term ‘incorporation surrender’ when used in any provision of Chapter 10 (§

13.1-801

et seq.) of Title 13.1 of the Code of Virginia, the term ‘organization surrender’ when used in any provision of Chapter 12 (§

13.1-1000

et seq.) of Title 13.1 of the Code of Virginia, and the term ‘trust surrender’ when used in any provision of Chapter 14 (§

13.1-1200

et seq.) of Title 13.1 of the Code of Virginia shall also be construed to mean ‘domestication,’ and the term ‘entity conversion’ when used in any provision of Chapter 10, 12, or 14 of Title 13.1 of the Code of Virginia shall also be construed to mean ‘conversion.’ ”